Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 35. Gaming and Gambling on Passenger Vessels.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that enacted AS

43.35.200

—

43.35.220

(formerly AS 05.16), provides that “[I]t is the intention of the people of Alaska that any portion of this legislation that is declared unlawful shall be stricken in a manner that preserves the remaining portion of the remaining legislation to the maximum extent possible.”

Secs. 43.35.010 — 43.35.070.
Amount of tax; administration; distributor fees; operation by a minor; distribution of tax; orders and regulations; gambling not legalized. [Repealed, § 2 ch 39 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 43.35.080.
Penalties. [Repealed, § 46 ch 113 SLA 1980.
For current law, see AS 43.05.220 and 43.05.290.]

Sec. 43.35.090.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 2 ch 39 SLA 1998.]

Secs. 43.35.100 — 43.35.150.
License tax; regulations and orders; manner of paying tax; refund to local governments; gambling not legalized; violations and penalties. [Repealed, § 2 ch 39 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 43.35.200.
Gambling activities aboard commercial vessels purportedly authorized by federal law.

AS

43.35.200

—

43.35.220

apply to the use of playing cards, dice, roulette wheels, coin-operated instruments or machines, or other objects or instruments used, designed, or intended for gaming or gambling used in the waters under the jurisdiction of the State of Alaska on a voyage described in 15 U.S.C. 1175(c)(2), and to any other gambling activities taking place aboard large passenger vessels in the state.

History.

(§ 2, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

05.16.010

.
Renumbered in 2008, at which time “AS

43.35.200

—

43.35.220

apply” was substituted for “This chapter applies”.

Administrative Code. —

For tax on gaming or gambling activities aboard large passenger vessels, see 15 AAC 165, art. 1.

Sec. 43.35.210.
Tax on gambling activities.

There is imposed on the operator of gaming or gambling activities aboard large passenger vessels in the state a tax of 33 percent of the adjusted gross income from those activities. “Adjusted gross income” means gross income less prizes awarded and federal and municipal taxes paid or owed on the income. The tax shall be collected and is due and payable to the Department of Revenue in the manner and at the times required by the Department of Revenue.

History.

(§ 2, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, “a” was deleted following “operator of” in the first sentence to correct a grammatical error in 2006 Ballot Measure No. 2. Formerly AS 05.16.020. Renumbered in 2008.

Administrative Code. —

For tax on gaming or gambling activities aboard large passenger vessels, see 15 AAC 165, art. 1.

Sec. 43.35.220.
Disposition of receipts.

The proceeds from the tax on gambling operations aboard commercial passenger vessels in the state’s marine water shall be deposited in the large passenger vessel gaming and gambling tax account that is established as a subaccount within the commercial vessel passenger tax account (AS

43.52.230(a)

).

History.

(§ 2, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am § 1 ch 101 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 05.16.030. Renumbered in 2008.